Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-370
Cost of patient care; failure to furnish information; effect.

When any relative willfully fails to furnish to the department, upon request, the information required by sections 83-227.01, 83-227.02, 83-350, and 83-363 to 83-379 as to his or her taxable income, such relative shall be deemed to have ability to pay the entire cost determined under sections 83-227.01, 83-227.02, 83-350, and 83-363 to 83-379.

Laws 1969, c. 812, § 8, p. 3053;

Laws 2026, LB1048, § 35.
July 18, 2026
The presumption of ability to pay under this section does not extend to a patient who fails to provide the necessary financial information. The Department of Public Institutions was without authority to fashion such a rule. State ex rel. Spire v. Stodola, 228 Neb. 107, 421 N.W.2d 436 (1988).